Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2213
Supreme Court; establish rules; uniform administration, proceedings, and practice.

The Supreme Court shall have authority to establish rules to carry into effect the provisions of this code so that its administration, proceedings, and practice shall be uniform.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 13.